Missouri, session 2026, HB2624.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 660, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 660.850, to read as follows:
660.850. 1. There is hereby established within the department the "Kinship
Infant Care Support Program" to provide financial support payments to an eligible
caregiver who cares for an infant so that the infant's parent or parents may work,
attend school, or participate in job training. All moneys deposited into the kinship
infant care support fund established in this section shall be used for such financial
support payments and for training and background checks required under this section.
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Background check", includes:
(a) A state and Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint check; and
(b) The state-based child abuse and neglect registry and database;
(2) "Caregiver", a person who is a biological grandparent, great-grandparent,
aunt, uncle, or sibling eighteen years of age or older to an infant and who is a Missouri
resident;
(3) "Department", the department of social services;
(4) "Infant", a person under one year of age who is biologically related to a
caregiver.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2624 2
3. (1) In order for a caregiver to be eligible for financial support payments
under this section, a parent or parents of an infant shall:
(a) Engage in work, education, or job training for at least twenty hours per
week; and
(b) Have a household income at or below two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level.
(2) The parent or parents shall provide proof of the requirements under
subdivision (1) of this subsection to the department as provided by the department.
4. (1) The department shall pay an eligible caregiver an hourly rate per infant.
A caregiver of an infant whose parent or parents are at or below one hundred fifty
percent of the federal poverty level shall be given a higher hourly rate compared to a
parent or parents who are one hundred fifty-one percent to two hundred fifty percent of
the federal poverty level.
(2) The hourly rate shall be established by the department.
(3) Caregivers:
(a) May be paid for up to sixty hours per week per infant;
(b) May care for no more than two infants at one time; and
(c) Shall not receive payments for hours already covered by other child care
subsidies, foster care payments, or temporary assistance to needy families child-only
grants.
5. (1) In addition to all other eligibility requirements provided in this section, a
caregiver shall also successfully complete a background check before receiving any
financial support payments under this section. Each caregiver shall be subject to the
background check every five years.
(2) (a) The caregiver shall:
a. Initially complete twelve hours of health and safety training, including
training in infant cardiopulmonary resuscitation, safe sleep practices, abuse recognition,
shaken baby prevention, and infant development. After the initial health and safety
training, the caregiver shall receive annual training as required by the department; and
b. Attest that his or her home meets basic safety standards, including a safe sleep
space, fire detectors, and safe storage for firearms.
(b) The caregiver shall submit all information required under paragraph (a) of
this subdivision in a manner provided by the department.
6. Caregivers receiving Supplemental Security Income or Social Security
Disability Insurance may participate in the kinship infant care support program if the
caregiver's disability does not prevent safe infant care; the caregiver's total household
income, including Supplemental Security Income or Social Security Disability

HB 2624 3
Insurance, is within the applicable federal program limit; and the caregiver meets all
training and safety requirements.
7. The department shall:
(1) Create accessible applications that are to be completed by the parent or
parents. Such applications shall be available on paper or online and be in English or
Spanish. A completed application shall be approved or denied by the department within
thirty days of applying for financial support payments for a caregiver. Any application
that has been denied shall state the reason or reasons for denial;
(2) Provide or contract for required training and background checks at no cost
to the parent or parents or caregiver; and
(3) Process financial support payments within thirty days of receiving complete
monthly attendance records.
8. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Kinship Infant Care
Support Fund". The fund shall be administered by the department. The fund shall
consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and any gifts, bequests, or
donations to such fund. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In
accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve
disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys
in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this section and pay any administrative
costs associated with the kinship infant care support program. However, no more than
ten percent of the moneys in the fund shall be used to pay for the administrative costs.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
9. The department shall submit quarterly updates and an annual report to the
general assembly covering enrollment, spending, outcomes, and safety data, and
commission a comprehensive independent evaluation three years after implementation.
10. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently

HB 2624 4
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔